Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2506.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6120 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6120. [Limitation on the] Local regulation of firearms and ammunition.(a) General rule.--[No] A county, municipality or township may [in any manner] regulate the [lawful] ownership, possession, transfer or transportation of firearms, ammunition or ammunition components [when carried or transported for purposes not prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth] by ordinance or any other action that is not otherwise prohibited by Federal or 123456789101112131415161718 State law.[(a.1) No right of action.--(1) No political subdivision may bring or maintain an action at law or in equity against any firearms or ammunition manufacturer, trade association or dealer for damages, abatement, injunctive relief or any other relief or remedy resulting from or relating to either the lawful design or manufacture of firearms or ammunition or the lawful marketing or sale of firearms or ammunition to the public.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a political subdivision from bringing or maintaining an action against a firearms or ammunition manufacturer or dealer for breach of contract or warranty as to firearms or ammunition purchased by the political subdivision.](b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:["Dealer." The term shall include any person engaged in the business of selling at wholesale or retail a firearm or ammunition.]"Firearms." [This term shall have the meaning given to it in section 5515 (relating to prohibiting of paramilitary training) but shall not include air rifles as that term is defined in section 6304 (relating to sale and use of air rifles).] A weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of the weapon.["Political subdivision." The term shall include any home rule charter municipality, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or school district.]20260HB2506PN3392 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Section 2962(g) of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 2962. Limitation on municipal powers.* * *[(g) Regulation of firearms.--A municipality shall not enact any ordinance or take any other action dealing with the regulation of the transfer, ownership, transportation or possession of firearms.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2506PN3392 - 3 - 123456789